parSem/xip/archive/simple/english/FST/src/TOKENIZER/tok-basic.xfst
# ============================================================================
# CONTENT:	(x)fst script for tokenizer FST (no multi-words)
#
# LANGUAGE:	ENGLISH
# CHARENCODING: ISO-8859-1
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:	20-Jan-2006
# 		- derived form older tokenizer files
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:	xfst -s [AbbrFST] -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

define ABBR

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define token separator symbol
define TS	"*TS*" ;

echo >>> define internal markers
define LFT	"<*" ;
define RGT	"*>" ;

define ANY	\[TS];
define ANY1	ANY - [LFT|RGT] ;

define INPUT	ANY1* ;

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define white space
define SPACE [
  "\u0020" 	# SPACE
| "\u0009"  	# HORIZONTAL TABULATION
| "\u000A"  	# LINE FEED
| "\u000D" 	# CARRIAGE RETURN
| "\u00A0" 	# NO-BREAK SPACE
];


# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define single symbols
define SINGLE [
  "\u0021"	# !	EXCLAMATION MARK
| "\u0022"	# "	QUOTATION MARK
| "\u0028"	# (	LEFT PARENTHESIS
| "\u0029"	# )	RIGHT PARENTHESIS
| "\u003C"	# <	LESS-THAN SIGN
| "\u003E"	# >	GREATER-THAN SIGN
| "\u003F"	# ?	QUESTION MARK
| "\u005B"	# [	LEFT SQUARE BRACKET
| "\u005D"	# ]	RIGHT SQUARE BRACKET
| "\u007B"	# {	LEFT CURLY BRACKET
| "\u007D"	# }	RIGHT CURLY BRACKET
| "\u00A1"	# ¡	INVERTED EXCLAMATION MARK
| "\u00A4"	# ¤	CURRENCY SIGN
| "\u00AB"	# «	LEFT-POINTING DOUBLE ANGLE QUOTATION MARK
| "\u00B7"	# ·	MIDDLE DOT
| "\u00BB"	# »	RIGHT-POINTING DOUBLE ANGLE QUOTATION MARK
| "\u00BF"	# ¿	INVERTED QUESTION MARK
| "\u2014"	# (--)	EM DASH						## was: \x97
| "\u201C" 	# (``)	LEFT DOUBLE QUOTATION MARK			## was: \x93
| "\u201D"	# ('')	RIGHT DOUBLE QUOTATION MARK			## was: \x94
| "\u201E"	# (,,)	DOUBLE LOW-9 QUOTATION MARK			## was: \x84
| "\u2022"	# (*)	BULLET						## was: \x95
| "\u2026"	# (...)	HORIZONTAL ELLIPSIS				## was: \x85
| "\u2039" 	# (<)	SINGLE LEFT-POINTING ANGLE QUOTATION MARK	## was: \x8B
| "\u203A"	# (>)	SINGLE RIGHT-POINTING ANGLE QUOTATION MARK	## was: \x9B
];


# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define boundary symbols
define BOUND [
  "\u0027"	# '	APOSTROPHE
| "\u0060"	# `	GRAVE ACCENT
| "\u00B4"	# ´	ACUTE ACCENT
| "\u00B8"	# ¸	CEDILLA
| "\u2018" 	# (`)	LEFT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK			## was: \x91
| "\u2019" 	# (')	RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK			## was: \x92
];

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define QUOTES

define LQUOTE [
  "\u0060"	# `	GRAVE ACCENT
| "\u2018" 	# (`)	LEFT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK			## was: \x91
];

define RQUOTE [
  "\u0027"	# '	APOSTROPHE
| "\u00B4"	# ´	ACUTE ACCENT
| "\u2019" 	# (')	RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK			## was: \x92
];


define QUOTE	RQUOTE | LQUOTE ;

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define right boundary symbols
define RIGHT [

  "\u002C"	# ,	COMMA
| "\u002E"	# .	FULL STOP
| "\u003A"	# :	COLON
| "\u003B"	# ;	SEMICOLON
| "\u201A" 	# (,)	SINGLE LOW-9 QUOTATION MARK			## was: \x82
];

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> alphanumeric symbols (ie. anything else!)

define ALPHA	ANY - [RIGHT|BOUND|SINGLE|SPACE];

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define special tokens
read regex
[
  "\u0027" (TS) "\u0027"	# ''
| "\u002C" (TS) "\u002C"	# ,,
| "\u0060" (TS) "\u0060"	# ``
| "\u00B4" (TS) "\u00B4"	# ´´
| "\u00B8" (TS) "\u00B8"	# ¸¸
| "\u2018" (TS) "\u2018"	# (``)
| "\u2019" (TS) "\u2019"	# ('')
| "\u201A" (TS) "\u201A"	# (,,) 
| %. [ (TS) %. ]+
| %- [ (TS) %- ]+ 
];
define SPEC


define SYMBOL	ALPHA | BOUND | RIGHT | SINGLE	;	# anything but white space

define BOUND2	[ BOUND | RIGHT ] ;

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define word boundary

define BD	[ SPACE | TS | .#. ] ;

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> build minimal tokenizer

regex
[
INPUT 

# insert token separator before SPACES
.o.	[..] -> TS || SYMBOL _ SPACE 

# insert token separator at end of file
.o.	[..] -> TS || SYMBOL _ .#.	

# insert token separator around single symbols
.o.	[..] -> TS ||	SYMBOL _ [ SINGLE | SPEC ]
.o.	[..] -> TS ||	[ SINGLE | SPEC ] _ SYMBOL

# insert token separator before boundaries
.o.	[..] ->	TS ||	SYMBOL _ BOUND2 [ BOUND2 | SPACE | TS ]

# insert token separator after boundaries
.o.	[..] ->	TS ||	[ BOUND | SPACE | TS | .#. ] BOUND _ SYMBOL

# remove token separator in special symbols
.o.	SPEC @-> LFT ... RGT 
.o.	TS -> 0 || LFT [ANY1|TS]* _ [ANY1|TS]* RGT
.o.	[LFT|RGT] -> 0
];
define TOK

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> remove token boundary after some quotes

define Digit	[ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ];
define YEAR	[ Digit Digit ];

read regex
[
  TOK 
.o. [ TS -> 0 || BD QUOTE _ YEAR BD ]
];
define TOK

# =============================================================
echo >>> define word parts to be separated

define PARTS	[ m | s | r e | d | v e | l l ];


# =============================================================
echo >>> remove token boundary before some (single) quotes

read regex
[
  TOK 
.o. [ TS -> 0 || BD RQUOTE _ PARTS BD ]
];
define TOK

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> remove token boundary in abbreviations


regex	[ ABBR .o. [ %. -> 0 || _ .#. ] ].2 ;
define ABBR

read regex
 TOK 
  .o. [ TS -> 0	 || BD ABBR _ %.  ]
  .o. [ [..] -> TS || BD ABBR %. _ %. ] ;

define TOK

# =============================================================
echo >>> additional token boundary before PARTS
read regex
[
  TOK 
.o. [ [..] -> TS || SYMBOL _ RQUOTE PARTS BD ]
];
define TOK

# =============================================================

echo >>> remove white space:
read regex   TOK .o.  [ [SPACE]+ @-> 0 || [ .#. | TS ] _ ] ;

# =============================================================
echo >>> replace token boundary by new line
substitute symbol "\n" for  "*TS*"

echo >>> eliminate auxiliary symbols
substitute symbol ? for "<*"
substitute symbol ? for "*>"

echo >>> invert net
invert net
